Utah statutes.
58-24b-401.   Authority and ethical standards of a licensed physical therapist and licensed physical therapist assistant -- Function of a physical therapy aide.

(1)  A licensed physical therapist:

(a)  is fully authorized to practice physical therapy; and

(b)  shall adhere to the standards of ethics described in:

(i)  the American Physical Therapy Association's Code of Ethics and Guide for Professional Conduct; and

(ii)  rule.

(2)  A licensed physical therapist assistant:

(a)  is authorized to practice physical therapy:

(i)  under the on-site supervision or general supervision of a licensed physical therapist; and

(ii)  within the scope of practice of a licensed physical therapist assistant, as described in this chapter and by rule;

(b)  shall adhere to the standards of ethics described in:

(i)  the American Physical Therapy Association's Code of Ethics and Guide for Professional Conduct; and

(ii)  rule; and

(c)  may not be supervised by any person other than a licensed physical therapist.

(3) (a)  A physical therapy aide may not engage in the practice of physical therapy.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), a physical therapy aide may provide routine assistance to:

(i)  a licensed physical therapist while the licensed physical therapist engages in the practice of physical therapy, if the physical therapy aide is under the on-site supervision of the licensed physical therapist; or

(ii)  a licensed physical therapist assistant while the licensed physical therapist assistant engages in the practice of physical therapy, within the scope of the licensed physical therapist assistant's license, if the physical therapy aide is:

(A)  under the general or on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist; and

(B)  under the on-site supervision of the licensed physical therapist assistant.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 2009 General Session

